District of Columbia statutes.
34-1506

Duties of the electric company.

(a)

(1)

The electric company shall provide distribution services to all customers and electricity suppliers on rates, terms of access, and conditions that are comparable to the electric company’s own use of its distribution system. The electric company shall not operate its distribution system in a manner that favors the electricity supply of the electric company’s affiliates.

(2)

To the extent this provision is not preempted by federal law or regulation, the electric company shall provide transmission services to all customers and electricity suppliers on rates, terms, and conditions that are comparable to the electric company’s own use of its transmission system.

(b)

The electric company shall maintain the reliability of its distribution system in accordance with applicable orders, tariffs, and regulations of the Commission.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 106, 47 DCR 1091
This section is referenced in § 34-1504.